Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,120
Infraction of rules or policies; report; filed with warden.

A written report of any infraction shall be filed with the warden within seventy-two hours of the occurrence of such infraction or the discovery of it. Such report shall be placed in the files of the institution or facility.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 12.

Where a disciplinary misconduct report was not prepared and submitted within 72 hours of the discovery of a penal inmate's infraction and the inmate was not prejudiced by the delay, there is no violation of due process. Billups v. Nebraska Dept. of Corr. Servs. Appeals Bd., 238 Neb. 39, 469 N.W.2d 120 (1991).